North Carolina statutes. Chapter 45. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust.
ARTICLE 4.
Satisfaction.

§ 45-36.2. Obligation of good faith.

Every action or duty within this Article imposes an obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.

(1953, c. 848; 2005-123, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, rewrote the Article 4 heading and the heading and text of this section.

§ 45-36.3. Notification by mortgagee of satisfaction of provisions of deed of trust or mortgage, or other instrument; civil penalty.

After the satisfaction of the provisions of any deed of trust or mortgage, or other instrument intended to secure with real property the payment of money or the performance of any other obligation and registered as required by law, the holder of the evidence of the indebtedness, if it is a single instrument, or a duly authorized agent or attorney of such holder shall within 60 days:

Discharge and release of record such documents and forward the cancelled documents to the grantor, trustor or mortgagor; or,

Alternatively, the holder of the evidence of the indebtedness or a duly authorized agent or attorney of such holder, at the request of the grantor, trustor or mortgagor, shall forward said instrument and the deed of trust or mortgage instrument, with payment and satisfaction acknowledged in accordance with the requirements of

G.S. 45-37

, to the grantor, trustor or mortgagor.

Any person, institution or agent who fails to comply with this section may be required to pay a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in addition to reasonable attorneys' fees and any other damages awarded by the court to the grantor, trustor or mortgagor, or to a subsequent purchaser of the property from the grantor, trustor or mortgagor. A five hundred dollar ($500.00) civil penalty may be recovered by the grantor, trustor or mortgagor, and a five hundred dollar ($500.00) penalty may be recovered by the purchaser of the property from the grantor, trustor or mortgagor. If that purchaser of the property consists of more than a single grantee, then the civil penalty will be divided equally among all of the grantees. A petitioner may recover damages under this section only if he has given the mortgagee, obligee, beneficiary or other responsible party written notice of his intention to bring an action pursuant to this section. Upon receipt of this notice, the mortgagee, obligee, beneficiary or other responsible party shall have 30 days, in addition to the initial 60-day period, to fulfill the requirements of this section.

Should any person, institution or agent who is not the present holder of the evidence of indebtedness be required to pay a civil penalty, attorneys' fees, or other damages under this section, they will have an action against the holder of the evidence of indebtedness for all sums they were required to pay.

This section applies only if the provisions of the deed of trust, mortgage, or other instrument are satisfied before October 1, 2005.

(1979, c. 681, s. 1; 1987, c. 662, ss. 1-3; 2005-123, s. 1.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2005-123, s. 1, effective October 1, 2005, added subsection (d).

§ 45-36.4. Definitions.

As used in this Article, the following terms mean:

Address for giving a notification. - For the purpose of a particular type of notification, the most recent address provided in a document by the intended recipient of the notification to the person giving the notification, unless the person giving the notification knows of a more accurate address, in which case the term means that address.

(1a) Borrower. - A person primarily liable for payment or performance of the obligation secured by the real property described in a security instrument.

(1b) Credit suspension directive. - A notification given to a secured creditor pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.7

A directing the secured creditor to suspend temporarily a borrower's right and ability to obtain additional credit advances in anticipation of the imminent sale of, or the imminent making of a new loan to be secured by, real property then encumbered by an existing security instrument when the anticipated transaction will involve either the satisfaction of the existing security instrument or the release of the real property from the lien of the existing security instrument.

Day. - Calendar day.

Document. - Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

Electronic. - Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

Entitled person. - A person who:

Is a borrower;

Is a landowner;

Has contracted to purchase real property encumbered by an existing security instrument;

Has made or has committed to make a loan that is secured or is to be secured by real property encumbered by an existing security instrument;

Is a title insurance company authorized pursuant to Article 26 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes to issue title insurance policies in the State of North Carolina that has insured or has committed to insure title to real property encumbered by an existing security instrument;

Is the foreclosing trustee or the high bidder in a foreclosure sale involving real property encumbered by an existing security instrument;

Is a qualified lien holder; or

Is an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of North Carolina or a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union, but only when:

The attorney, bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union is or will be responsible for the disbursement of funds in connection with the sale of, or a new loan secured by, property then encumbered by an existing security instrument; and

A requirement of the sale or new loan transaction is or will be that the property be conveyed or encumbered free and clear of the lien of the existing security instrument.

Good faith. - Honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.

Landowner. - A person that, before foreclosure, has the right of redemption in the real property described in a security instrument. The term does not include a person that holds only a lien on the real property or the trustee under a deed of trust.

Notification. - A document containing information required under this Article and signed by the person required to provide the information.

Original parties. - With respect to a security instrument, each person named as a party to the security instrument on the face thereof as originally recorded. In identifying the original parties to a deed of trust for purposes of this Article, it is not necessary to include the original trustee or trustees named therein.

Payoff amount. - The sum necessary to satisfy a secured obligation.

Payoff statement. - A document containing the information specified in G.S. 45-36.7(e).

Person. - An individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(12a) Qualified lien holder. - A person who holds or is the beneficiary of a security interest in or lien on real property encumbered by an existing security instrument, but only if that person's security interest in or lien on the real property arises from a mortgage or deed of trust that is subordinate in priority to the lien of the existing security instrument. The term does not include a trustee under a deed of trust.

Recording data. - The book and page number or document number that indicates where a document is recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

Register of deeds. - Includes the register of deeds, assistant register of deeds, or deputy register of deeds.

Satisfy. - With respect to a security instrument, to terminate the effectiveness of the security instrument.

Secured creditor. - A person that holds or is the beneficiary of a security interest or that is authorized both to receive payments on behalf of a person that holds a security interest and to record a satisfaction of the security instrument upon receiving full performance of the secured obligation. The term does not include a trustee under a security instrument.

Secured obligation. - An obligation the payment or performance of which is secured by a security interest.

Security instrument. - An agreement, however denominated, that creates or provides for an interest in real property to secure payment or performance of an obligation, whether or not it also creates or provides for a lien on personal property. The term includes a deed of trust and a mortgage.

Security interest. - An interest in real property created by a security instrument.

(19a) Short-pay amount. - The sum necessary to obtain the release of all or a specific portion of the real property from the lien of a security instrument without satisfying the secured obligation in full.

(19b) Short-pay statement. - A document containing the information specified in G.S. 45-36.7(e1).

Sign. - With present intent to authenticate or adopt a document:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the document an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

State. - A state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Submit for recording. - To deliver, with required fees and taxes, a document sufficient to be recorded under this Article to the register of deeds in the county in which the real property described in the related security instrument is located.

Trustee. - The trustee or substitute then serving as such under the terms of a deed of trust.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2011-312, s. 3.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-312, s. 3, effective October 1, 2011, added subdivisions (1a) and (1b); rewrote subdivision (5), which formerly read: "Entitled person. - A person liable for payment or performance of the obligation secured by the real property described in a security instrument, or the landowner"; added "or the trustee under a deed of trust" at the end of subdivision (7); updated the section reference in subdivision (11); and added subdivisions (12a), (19a), (19b), and (23).

§ 45-36.5. Notification: manner of giving and effective date.

A person gives a notification by any of the following:

Depositing it with the United States Postal Service with first-class postage paid or with a commercially reasonable delivery service with cost of delivery provided, properly addressed to the recipient's address for giving a notification.

Sending it by facsimile transmission, electronic mail, or other electronic transmission to the recipient's address for giving a notification, but only if the recipient agreed to receive notification in that manner.

Causing it to be received at the address for giving a notification within the time that it would have been received if given pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.

A notification is effective on any of the following:

The day after it is deposited with a commercially reasonable delivery service for overnight delivery.

Three days after it is deposited with the United States Postal Service, first-class mail with postage prepaid, or with a commercially reasonable delivery service for delivery other than by overnight delivery.

The day it is given, if given pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

The day it is received, if given by a method other than as provided in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section.

If this Article or a notification given pursuant to this Article requires performance on or by a certain day and that day is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday under the laws of this State or the United States, the performance is sufficient if performed on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(2005-123, s. 1.)

§ 45-36.6. Document of rescission: effect; liability for wrongful recording.

Definitions. - The following definitions apply in this section:

Document of rescission. - A document that rescinds either (i) a release that was recorded in error or (ii) the erroneous satisfaction of a security instrument.

Release. - A document that either (i) releases property from the lien of a security instrument or (ii) indicates that an obligation is no longer secured by a security instrument.

If a release is recorded in error or a security instrument is erroneously satisfied of record, then the secured creditor or the person who caused the release to be recorded in error or the security instrument to be erroneously satisfied of record may execute and record a document of rescission. The document of rescission must be duly acknowledged before an officer authorized to make acknowledgments. Upon recording, the document of rescission either (i) rescinds a release that was recorded in error and deprives the release of any effect or (ii) rescinds the erroneous satisfaction of record of the security instrument and reinstates the security instrument.

A recorded document of rescission has no effect on the rights of a person that:

Records an interest in the real property described in a security instrument after the recording of a release that was recorded in error or the erroneous satisfaction of record of the security instrument and before the recording of the document of rescission; and

Would otherwise have priority over or take free of the lien created by the security instrument as reinstated under Chapter 47 of the General Statutes.

A person that erroneously or wrongfully records a document of rescission is liable to any person injured thereby for the actual loss caused by the recording and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

A document is a document of rescission if it does all of the following:

Identifies the related security instrument, including the type of security instrument, the original parties to the security instrument, the recording data for the security instrument, and the office in which the security instrument is recorded.

If the document of rescission is intended to rescind a release that was recorded in error, (i) identifies the release that was recorded in error by its recording data and the office in which it is recorded, (ii) states that the release was recorded in error, and (iii) states that the release is rescinded.

If the document of rescission is intended to rescind the erroneous satisfaction of record of a security instrument, (i) identifies the satisfaction document that was recorded in error by its recording data and the office in which it is recorded, (ii) states that the security instrument was erroneously satisfied of record, and (iii) states that the satisfaction of the security instrument is rescinded and the security instrument reinstated.

States that the person signing the document of rescission is either (i) the secured creditor or (ii) the person who caused the release to be recorded in error or the security instrument to be erroneously satisfied of record.

Is signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property.

The register of deeds shall accept a document of rescission for recording unless one of the following applies:

The document is submitted by a method or in a medium not authorized for registration by the register of deeds under applicable law.

The required recording fee is not paid.

The document is not signed and acknowledged as required by law for a conveyance of an interest in real property by either the secured creditor or the person who caused the release to be recorded in error or the security instrument to be erroneously satisfied of record. The register of deeds shall not be required to verify or make inquiry concerning (i) the truth of the matters stated in any document of rescission or (ii) the authority of the person executing any document of rescission to do so.

No particular phrasing is required for a document of rescission that rescinds a release that was recorded in error. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of subsection (e) of this section:

No particular phrasing is required for a document of rescission that rescinds the erroneous satisfaction of a security instrument. The following form, when properly completed, is sufficient to satisfy the requirements of G.S. 45-36.6(e):

"DOCUMENT OF RESCISSION

(G.S. 45-36.6(e))

The security instrument to which this Document of Rescission relates is identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ______________ at Page ________ or as document number ________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina.
This Document of Rescission rescinds the release recorded in Book ______________
at Page ________ or as document number ________
in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina. The release was recorded in error, is hereby rescinded, and is declared to be of no effect.
The undersigned is: (check applicable box)
________ The secured creditor in the security instrument identified above.
________ The person who caused the release to be recorded in error.
Date: ____________________________
__________________________________
Signature of secured creditor or
person who caused the release to
be recorded in error

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]"

"DOCUMENT OF RESCISSION

(G.S. 45-36.6(e))

The security instrument to which this Document of Rescission relates is identified as follows:
Type of Security Instrument: (identify type of security instrument, such as deed of trust or mortgage)
Original Grantor(s): (identify original grantor(s), trustor(s), or mortgagor(s))
Original Secured Party(ies): (identify the original beneficiary(ies), mortgagee(s), or secured party(ies) in the security instrument)
Recording Data: The security instrument is recorded in Book ______________ at Page ________ or as document number ________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina.
The security instrument was erroneously satisfied of record by that satisfaction document recorded in Book ______________ at Page ________ or as document number ________ in the office of the Register of Deeds for ______________ County, North Carolina. The satisfaction of the security instrument is hereby rescinded, the security instrument is reinstated, and the security instrument is declared to be in full force and effect.
The undersigned is: (check applicable box)
________
The secured creditor in the security instrument identified above.
________
The person who caused the security instrument to be satisfied of record erroneously.
Date: ____________________________
__________________________________
Signature of secured creditor or person who caused the security instrument to be satisfied of record erroneously

[Acknowledgment before officer authorized to take acknowledgments]".

(2005-123, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 52(b); 2006-264, s. 40(a); 2011-312, s. 4.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2006-264, s. 40(a), as amended by 2006-259, s. 52(b), effective October 1, 2006, added the second sentence in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-312, s. 4, effective October 1, 2011, rewrote subsections (a) and (b); in subdivision (c)(1), substituted "recording of a release that was recorded in error" for "recording of the satisfaction or affidavit of satisfaction of the security instrument" and deleted "by other means" following "security instrument"; and added subsections (e) through (h).

§ 45-36.7. Payoff and short-pay statements; request and content.

An entitled person, or an agent authorized by an entitled person to request a payoff or a short-pay statement, may give to the secured creditor a notification requesting a payoff statement or a short-pay statement. The notification must contain all of the following:

The entitled person's name.

If given by a person other than an entitled person, the name of the person giving the notification and a statement that the person is an authorized agent of the entitled person.

A direction whether the statement is to be sent to the entitled person or that person's authorized agent.

The address to which the creditor must send the statement.

Sufficient information to enable the creditor to identify the secured obligation and the real property encumbered by the security interest.

Whether the request is for a payoff statement or a short-pay statement.

If the request is for a payoff statement, the specified payoff date, which may not be more than 30 days after the notification is given.

If the request is for a short-pay statement, (i) the specified short-pay date, which may not be more than 30 days after the notification is given, (ii) a clear statement as to whether the request is for the short-pay amount required to release all of the real property described in the security instrument or only a portion of that property, and (iii) if the request is for the short-pay amount required to release only a portion of the real property described in the security instrument, a description of the specific real property to be released upon payment of the short-pay amount.

If a notification under subsection (a) of this section directs the secured creditor to send the payoff statement or a short-pay statement to a person identified as an authorized agent of the entitled person, the secured creditor must send the statement to the agent, unless the secured creditor knows that the entitled person has not authorized the request.

A person who gives to a secured creditor a notification requesting a payoff statement or a short-pay statement thereby represents that the person is an entitled person or the authorized agent of an entitled person. A secured creditor may rely on that representation in providing a payoff statement or a short-pay statement unless the secured creditor knows that the requesting person is neither an entitled person nor the authorized agent of an entitled person. A secured creditor has no duty to make inquiry as to whether, or to verify that, the person requesting a payoff statement or a short-pay statement is an entitled person or the authorized agent of an entitled person.

Within 10 days after the effective date of a notification that complies with subsection (a) of this section, the secured creditor shall issue a payoff statement or a short-pay statement and send it as directed pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section in the manner prescribed in

G.S. 45-36.5

for giving a notification. A secured creditor that sends a payoff statement or a short-pay statement to the entitled person or the authorized agent may not claim that the notification did not satisfy subsection (a) of this section. If the person to whom the notification is given once held an interest in the secured obligation but has since assigned that interest, the person need not send a payoff statement or a short-pay statement but shall give (i) a notification of the assignment to the person to whom the payoff statement or a short-pay statement otherwise would have been sent, providing the name and address of the assignee, or (ii) a notification to the person to whom the payoff statement or a short-pay statement otherwise would have been sent, stating that the recipient claims no interest in the security instrument or the secured obligation, that the secured obligation was assigned, but that the identity and address of the assignee is not known.

A payoff statement must contain:

The date on which it was prepared and the payoff amount as of that date, including the amount by type of each fee, charge, or other sum included within the payoff amount;

The information reasonably necessary to calculate the payoff amount as of the requested payoff date, including the per diem interest amount; and

The payment cutoff time, if any, the address or place where payment must be made, and any limitation as to the authorized method of payment.

(e1)
A short-pay statement must contain:

(1) The information reasonably necessary to calculate the short-pay amount as of the requested short-pay date, including the per diem interest amount, if any;

(2) The payment cutoff time, if any, the address or place where payment of the short-pay amount must be made, and any limitation as to the authorized method of payment;

(3) Any conditions precedent that must be satisfied to obtain the release of the property identified in the request for the short-pay statement from the lien of the security instrument; and

Confirmation of the specific real property to be released from the lien of the security instrument upon receipt of the timely payment of the short-pay amount and satisfaction of the other conditions precedent to the release of that property.

Unless the short-pay statement expressly provides otherwise, all persons liable for payment or performance of the obligations secured by the security instrument will remain liable for the secured obligations to the extent the short-pay amount is not sufficient to satisfy the secured obligations in full.

A payoff statement or a short-pay statement may contain the amount of any fees authorized under this section not included in the payoff amount. A secured creditor may require the payment in full of any fees authorized under this section before issuing a payoff statement or a short-pay statement.

A secured creditor may not qualify a payoff amount or state that it is subject to change before the payoff date unless the payoff statement provides information sufficient to permit the entitled person or the person's authorized agent to request an updated payoff amount at no charge and to obtain that updated payoff amount during the secured creditor's normal business hours on the payoff date or the immediately preceding business day. A secured creditor may not qualify a short-pay amount or state that it is subject to change before the short-pay date unless the short-pay statement provides information sufficient to permit the entitled person or the person's authorized agent to request an updated short-pay amount at no charge and to obtain that updated short-pay amount during the secured creditor's normal business hours on the short-pay date or the immediately preceding business day.

A secured creditor must provide upon request one payoff statement or one short-pay statement without charge during any six-month period. A secured creditor may charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each additional payoff statement and one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each additional short-pay statement requested during that six-month period. However, a secured creditor may not charge a fee for providing an updated payoff amount or short-pay amount under subsection (g) of this section or a corrected payoff statement or short-pay statement under G.S. 45-36.8(a).

Unless the security instrument provides otherwise, a secured creditor is not required to send a payoff statement or a short-pay statement by means other than first-class mail. If the creditor agrees to send a statement by another means, it may charge a reasonable fee for complying with the requested manner of delivery.

Except as otherwise provided in

G.S. 45-36.12

, if a secured creditor to which a notification has been given pursuant to subsection (a) of this section does not send a timely payoff statement that substantially complies with subsection (e) of this section or a short-pay statement that substantially complies with subsection (e1) of this section, the creditor is liable to the entitled person for any actual damages caused by the failure, but not punitive damages. A creditor that does not pay the damages provided in this subsection within 30 days after receipt of a notification demanding payment shall also be liable for reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

This section does not apply unless (i) the notification requesting a payoff statement is given on or after October 1, 2005, and (ii) the notification requesting a short-pay statement is given on or after October 1, 2011.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2011-312, s. 5.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-312, s. 5, effective October 1, 2011, in the section catchline, substituted "Payoff and short-pay statements" for "Payoff statement"; throughout the section, inserted "or a short-pay statement"; in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), in the first sentence, deleted "statement" following "payoff" and "for a specified payoff date not more than 30 days after the notification is given" following "payoff statement"; added subdivisions (a)(6) through (a)(8); added subsection (e1); in subsection (g), added the last sentence; in subsection (h), in the first sentence, inserted "or one short-pay statement," in the second sentence, inserted "and one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each additional short-pay statement," and in the last sentence, inserted "or short-pay amount" and updated the internal reference; in the first sentence of subsection (j), substituted "subsection (e) of this section" for "subsection (d) of this section" and inserted "or a short-pay statement that substantially complies with subsection (e1) of this section"; and in subsection (k), inserted the designation "(i)" and added "and (ii) the notification requesting a short-pay statement is given on or after October 1, 2011."

§ 45-36.7A. Credit suspension directives.

A credit suspension directive may be given to a secured creditor by any of the following:

Any borrower.

The legal representative of any borrower.

The attorney for any borrower.

An attorney licensed to practice law in the State of North Carolina or a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union, but only when (i) the attorney, bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union is responsible for the disbursement of funds in connection with the sale of, or a new loan secured by, real property then encumbered by an existing security instrument; (ii) a requirement of the sale or new loan transaction is that the property be conveyed or encumbered free and clear of the lien of the existing security instrument; and (iii) the credit suspension directive is given to the secured creditor contemporaneously with a notification requesting a payoff statement or a short-pay statement in anticipation of and in preparation for the imminent settlement of the sale or new loan transaction.

A credit suspension directive must contain all of the following:

The name and authority of the person giving the directive.

Sufficient information to enable the creditor to identify the secured obligation, the identity of the borrower, and the real property encumbered by the security interest.

The specified payoff date, which may not be more than 30 days after the notification is given.

A clear and unambiguous directive to the secured creditor to suspend through and including the payoff date the borrower's right and ability to obtain any additional credit advances which, if made, would be secured by the security instrument.

If the person who gives a credit suspension directive to a secured creditor is a person listed in subdivision (a)(4) of this section, that person shall also (i) give a copy of the credit suspension directive to the borrower and (ii) provide an additional notification to the borrower that provides substantially as follows:

You have a loan with (name of lender) secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property located at (address of property).

We will be responsible for disbursing funds in connection with a scheduled sale of the property or a new loan that will be secured by the property. A requirement of the sale or new loan transaction is that the property be conveyed or encumbered free and clear of the existing mortgage or deed of trust that secures your loan.

As permitted by North Carolina law, we are sending the (enclosed/attached/following/foregoing) notification to your lender directing that it temporarily suspend your right and ability to obtain credit advances in anticipation of the settlement of the sale or loan. The notification accompanies a request asking the amount that must be sent to your lender to pay your loan in full and cancel the mortgage or deed of trust that secures your loan (or, if your loan will not be paid in full, to release the property from the mortgage or deed of trust that secures your loan). The information your lender provides us may be inaccurate if you obtain additional credit advances before the scheduled settlement date of the sale or new loan transaction.

When your lender receives our directive, it will temporarily suspend your right and ability to obtain credit advances. The period of suspension will continue through and including (anticipated payoff date), the anticipated payoff date, regardless of whether the settlement of the sale or new loan transaction occurs as scheduled. The suspension will not affect your responsibility to continue making payments to your lender during the suspension period. You should not attempt to obtain additional credit advances from your lender during the suspension period.

You may instruct us at any time during the suspension period to withdraw the credit suspension directive we are sending your lender, and we are required by law to comply. However, if you do so, you may jeopardize the settlement of the sale or new loan transaction because the payoff or release information provided by your lender may become inaccurate.

When proceeds from a sale or new loan transaction are used to pay an existing loan in full, lenders typically close the loan account, thereby terminating their borrower's ability to obtain additional credit advances. You should contact your lender to determine whether you will be able to obtain additional credit advances after the settlement of the sale or new loan transaction.

If you have questions about this notice or our action, please contact (name of contact person or department) by calling us at (phone number) or writing to us at (mailing address).

(Name of attorney, bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union)"

Upon receipt of a credit suspension directive, a secured creditor shall:

Subject to subsection (e) of this section, suspend the borrower's right and ability to obtain credit advances which, if made, would be secured by the security instrument. The period of suspension shall continue through and including the payoff date stated in the credit suspension directive.

Apply all sums subsequently paid during the period of suspension by or on behalf of the borrower in connection with the secured obligation, including sums paid to the secured creditor by a person responsible for the disbursement of funds in connection with the sale of, or a new loan secured by, real property then encumbered by a security instrument, to the satisfaction of the secured obligation, regardless of whether the amount or amounts paid are sufficient to pay the secured obligation and other sums secured by the security instrument in full. Sums paid to the secured creditor in excess of the amount required to pay the secured obligation and other sums secured by the security instrument in full shall be refunded by the secured creditor to or at the direction of the person who paid the excess amount.

Notwithstanding a secured creditor's receipt of a credit suspension directive, a secured creditor may do any of the following, all of which shall be secured by the security instrument:

The secured creditor may advance sums and incur expenses (i) for insurance, taxes, and assessments, (ii) to protect the secured creditor's interest under the security instrument, (iii) to preserve and protect the value or condition of the real property encumbered by the security instrument, or (iv) to complete the construction of improvements on the real property encumbered by the security instrument.

The secured creditor may permit the borrower to obtain a credit advance, but only if the credit advance was initiated or approved before the secured creditor received the credit suspension directive.

If the person giving a credit suspension directive is not a borrower, then the person giving a credit suspension directive shall be conclusively deemed the borrower's agent acting with full authority from the borrower to issue the credit suspension directive on the borrower's behalf.

A credit suspension directive may be withdrawn at any time by the person who gave the directive. If the person who gives a credit suspension directive to a secured creditor is a person listed in subdivision (a)(4) of this section, that person shall promptly notify the secured creditor that the credit suspension directive is withdrawn (i) if instructed by the borrower at any time to withdraw the directive or (ii) if the anticipated sale or new loan transaction is cancelled. Upon receipt of a notice from the person who originally gave the credit suspension directive that the credit suspension directive is withdrawn, the secured creditor may reinstate the borrower's right and ability to obtain credit advances.

"NOTICE TO BORROWER

(2011-312, s. 6.)

§ 45-36.8. Understated payoff statement or short-pay statement: correction; effect.

If a secured creditor determines that the payoff amount it provided in a payoff statement or the short-pay amount it provided in a short-pay statement was understated, the creditor may send a corrected payoff or short-pay statement. If the entitled person or the person's authorized agent receives and has a reasonable opportunity to act upon a corrected payoff statement or short-pay statement before making payment, the corrected statement supersedes an earlier statement.

A secured creditor that sends a payoff statement containing an understated payoff amount or a short-pay statement containing an understated short-pay amount may not deny the accuracy of the payoff amount or short-pay amount as against any person that reasonably and detrimentally relies upon the understated payoff amount or short-pay amount.

This Article does not:

Affect the right of a secured creditor to recover any sum that it did not include in a payoff amount or a short-pay amount from any person liable for payment of the secured obligation; or

Limit any claim or defense that a person liable for payment of a secured obligation may have under law other than this Article.

(2005-123, s. 1; 2011-312, s. 7.)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2011-312, s. 7, effective October 1, 2011, in the section catchline, substituted "payoff statement or short-pay statement" for "payoff statement"; in subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted "or the short-pay amount it provided in a short-pay statement" and substituted "payoff or short-pay statement" for "payoff statement," and in the last sentence, inserted "or short-pay statement"; in subsection (b), inserted "or a short-pay statement containing an understated short-pay amount" and twice added "or short-pay amount"; and in subdivision (c)(1), inserted "or a short-pay amount."